Nevada, session 83, SB40.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 422 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. The Medicaid Health Care Workforce Account is hereby
created in the State General Fund. The Administrator shall
administer the Account.
2. The money in the account must be used to:
(a) Pay the costs of administering the Account; and
(b) Support projects and programs to expand the health care
workforce of this State for which federal financial participation is
available under Title XIX of the Social Security Act, which may
include, without limitation:
(1) Programs to provide graduate medical education;
(2) Programs to pay the indirect costs of medical education;
(3) Fellowship and apprenticeship programs for providers
of health care; and
(4) Programs to assist with repayment of student education
loans for providers of health care.
3. The Administrator may apply for and accept any gift,
donation, bequest, grant or other source of money for the purposes
described in subsection 2. Any money so received must be
deposited in the Account.
4. The interest and income earned on the money in the
Account, after deducting any applicable charges, must be credited
to the Account. Any money remaining in the Account at the end of
the fiscal year does not revert to the State General Fund, and the
balance in the Account must be carried forward to the next fiscal
year.
5. Claims against the Account must be paid as other claims
against the State are paid.
6. As used in this section, “indirect costs of medical
education” means the higher costs for patient care paid by
facilities that provide graduate medical education relative to
facilities that do not provide graduate medical education.
Sec. 2. NRS 232.320 is hereby amended to read as follows:
232.320 1. The Director:
(a) Shall appoint, with the consent of the Governor,
administrators of the divisions of the Department, who are
respectively designated as follows:
(1) The Administrator of the Aging and Disability Services
Division;
(2) The Administrator of the Division of Welfare and
Supportive Services;
-
*SB40*

– 3 –
(3) The Administrator of the Division of Child and Family
Services;
(4) The Administrator of the Division of Health Care
Financing and Policy; and
(5) The Administrator of the Division of Public and
Behavioral Health.
(b) Shall administer, through the divisions of the Department,
the provisions of chapters 63, 424, 425, 427A, 432A to 442,
inclusive, 446 to 450, inclusive, 458A and 656A of NRS, NRS
127.220 to 127.310, inclusive, 422.001 to 422.410, inclusive, and
section 1 of this act, 422.580, 432.010 to 432.133, inclusive,
432B.6201 to 432B.626, inclusive, 444.002 to 444.430, inclusive,
and 445A.010 to 445A.055, inclusive, and all other provisions of
law relating to the functions of the divisions of the Department, but
is not responsible for the clinical activities of the Division of Public
and Behavioral Health or the professional line activities of the other
divisions.
(c) Shall administer any state program for persons with
developmental disabilities established pursuant to the
Developmental Disabilities Assistance and Bill of Rights Act of
2000, 42 U.S.C. §§ 15001 et seq.
(d) Shall, after considering advice from agencies of local
governments and nonprofit organizations which provide social
services, adopt a master plan for the provision of human services in
this State. The Director shall revise the plan biennially and deliver a
copy of the plan to the Governor and the Legislature at the
beginning of each regular session. The plan must:
(1) Identify and assess the plans and programs of the
Department for the provision of human services, and any
duplication of those services by federal, state and local agencies;
(2) Set forth priorities for the provision of those services;
(3) Provide for communication and the coordination of those
services among nonprofit organizations, agencies of local
government, the State and the Federal Government;
(4) Identify the sources of funding for services provided by
the Department and the allocation of that funding;
(5) Set forth sufficient information to assist the Department
in providing those services and in the planning and budgeting for the
future provision of those services; and
(6) Contain any other information necessary for the
Department to communicate effectively with the Federal
Government concerning demographic trends, formulas for the
distribution of federal money and any need for the modification of
programs administered by the Department.
-
*SB40*

– 4 –
(e) May, by regulation, require nonprofit organizations and state
and local governmental agencies to provide information regarding
the programs of those organizations and agencies, excluding
detailed information relating to their budgets and payrolls, which the
Director deems necessary for the performance of the duties imposed
upon him or her pursuant to this section.
(f) Has such other powers and duties as are provided by law.
2. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the Director, or
the Director’s designee, is responsible for appointing and removing
subordinate officers and employees of the Department.
Sec. 3. This act becomes effective on July 1, 2025.
H
-
*SB40*